Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.1691, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meaning given them. (b) "Carbon-free" means a technology that generates electricity without emitting carbon dioxide. (c) Unless otherwise specified in law, "eligible energy technology" means an energy technology that generates electricity from the following renewable energy sources: (1) solar; (2) wind; (3) hydroelectric with a capacity of: (i) less than 100 megawatts; or (ii) 100 megawatts or more, provided that the facility is in operation as of February 8, 2023; (4) hydrogen generated from the resources listed in this paragraph; or (5) biomass, which includes, without limitation, landfill gas; an anaerobic digester system; the predominantly organic components of wastewater effluent, sludge, or related by-products from publicly owned treatment works, but not including incineration of wastewater sludge to produce electricity; and, except as provided in subdivision 1a, an energy recovery facility used to capture the heat value of mixed municipal solid waste or refuse-derived fuel from mixed municipal solid waste as a primary fuel. (d) "Electric utility" meansdeleted text begin : (1) a public utility providing electric service; (2) a generation and transmission cooperative electric association; (3) a municipal power agency; (4) a power district; or (5) a cooperative electric association or municipal utility providing electric service that is not a member of an entity in clauses (2) to (4)deleted text end new text begin an investor-owned utilitynew text end . (e) "Environmental justice area" means an area in Minnesota that, based on the most recent data published by the United States Census Bureau, meets one or more of the following criteria: (1) 40 percent or more of the area's total population is nonwhite; (2) 35 percent or more of households in the area have an income that is at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty level; (3) 40 percent or more of the area's residents over the age of five have limited English proficiency; or (4) the area is located within Indian country, as defined in United State Code, title 18, section 1151. (f) "Total retail electric sales" means the kilowatt-hours of electricity sold in a year by an electric utility to retail customers of the electric utility or to a distribution utility for distribution to the retail customers of the distribution utility.